Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.470

Order to refrain from violations or practices—Administrative hearing or judicial review.

(1) Any administrative hearing provided in RCW 30A.04.450 or 30A.12.042 must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and held at the place designated by the director, and may be conducted by the department. The hearing shall be private unless the director determines that a public hearing is necessary to protect the public interest after fully considering the views of the party afforded the hearing.

(2) Within sixty days after the hearing, the director shall render a decision which shall include findings of fact upon which the decision is based and shall issue and serve upon each party to the proceeding an order or orders consistent with RCW 30A.04.450 or 30A.12.042, as the case may be.

(3) Unless a petition for review is timely filed in the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the affected bank under subsection (5) of this section and until the record in the proceeding has been filed as therein provided, the director may at any time modify, terminate, or set aside any order upon such notice and in such manner as he or she shall deem proper. Upon filing the record, the director may modify, terminate, or set aside any order only with permission of the court.

(4) The judicial review provided in this section is exclusive for orders issued under RCW 30A.04.450 and 30A.12.042.

(5) Any party to the proceeding or any person required by an order issued under RCW 30A.04.450, 30A.04.455, 30A.04.465, or 30A.12.042 to refrain from any of the violations or practices stated therein may obtain a review of any order served under subsection (1) of this section other than one issued upon consent by filing in the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the affected bank within ten days after the date of service of the order a written petition praying that the order of the director be modified, terminated, or set aside. A copy of the petition shall be immediately served upon the director and the director shall then file in the court the record of the proceeding. The court shall have jurisdiction upon the filing of the petition, which jurisdiction shall become exclusive upon the filing of the record to affirm, modify, terminate, or set aside in whole or in part the order of the director except that the director may modify, terminate, or set aside an order with the permission of the court. The judgment and decree of the court shall be final, except that it shall be subject to appellate review under the rules of court.

(6) The commencement of proceedings for judicial review under subsection (5) of this section shall not operate as a stay of any order issued by the director unless specifically ordered by the court.

(7) Service of any notice or order required to be served under RCW 30A.04.450, 30A.04.455, 30A.12.040, or 30A.12.042 shall be accomplished in the same manner as required for the service of process in civil actions in superior courts of this state.

[ 2014 c 37 s 140; 2010 c 88 s 18; 1994 c 92 s 34; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 8. Formerly RCW 30.04.470.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: See note following RCW 30A.04.450.